Illinois, session 104th, HB1105.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Clinical Laboratory and Blood Bank 5Act is amended by changing Sections 7-108, 7-110, and 7-111 6and by adding Section 7-120 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 25/7-108)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 627-108)8    Sec. 7-108. Duties of blood banks. A blood bank shall:9    (a) Collect, process, and provide for use blood or blood 10components from a blood donor only upon the consent of that 11donor and under the direction or delegated direction of the 12blood bank Medical Director.13    (b) Transfuse blood or blood components upon the request 14of a physician licensed to practice medicine in all its 15branches, a dentist, or a podiatric physician who is on the 16medical staff of a hospital and has permission from the 17medical staff to make such a request. If the request is oral, 18the physician or other authorized person shall submit a 19written request to the blood bank within 48 hours. If the blood 20bank does not receive the written request within that period, 21it shall note that fact in its records.22    (c) Test or have tested donated blood for evidence of any 23COVID-19 vaccine or any other messenger ribonucleic acid   HB1105- 2 -LRB104 03801 BAB 13825 b1(mRNA) vaccine components, including evidence of lipid 2nanoparticles and spike protein from a vaccine. 3    (d) Require a blood donor to disclose, during each blood 4donor screening process, whether the blood donor has received 5a COVID-19 vaccine or any other mRNA vaccine during the 6donor's lifetime. 7(Source: P.A. 98-214, eff. 8-9-13.) 8    (210 ILCS 25/7-110)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 627-110)9    Sec. 7-110. Blood labeling. Every person who withdraws 10blood from an individual or separates blood into components by 11physical processes shall affix to each container of blood or 12blood components a label that includes (1) the appropriate 13donor classification, "volunteer donor" or "paid donor", in no 14less prominence than the word "blood" or the name of the blood 15component and (2) a designation, if true, that the blood 16tested positive for evidence of a COVID-19 vaccine or any 17other messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) vaccine or was drawn 18from a blood donor who disclosed that the donor has received a 19COVID-19 vaccine or any other mRNA vaccine during the donor's 20lifetime.21    Any person who receives blood or blood components in this 22State from a federally licensed blood bank in another state 23shall not be required to relabel a container of blood or blood 24components if the container of blood or blood components is 25labeled with the appropriate donor classification, "volunteer   HB1105- 3 -LRB104 03801 BAB 13825 b1donor" or "paid donor", in no less prominence than the word 2"blood" or the name of the blood component.3(Source: P.A. 87-1269.) 4    (210 ILCS 25/7-111)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 627-111)5    Sec. 7-111. Administration of labeled blood. No person may 6administer blood by transfusion in this State or transfer or 7offer to transfer blood for transfusion purposes by any type 8of transaction unless the container of the blood is labeled as 9required by Section 7-110 and, if the container is designated 10under item (2) of Section 7-110, an acknowledgment from the 11person receiving the transfusion, or the authorized 12representative of the person, that the person or 13representative has been given the opportunity to refuse blood 14designated under item (2) of Section 7-110.15    When blood is administered by transfusion in this State, 16the identification number of the unit of blood shall be 17recorded in the patient's medical record and the label on the 18container of the blood shall not be removed before or during 19the administration of that blood by transfusion.20(Source: P.A. 87-1269.) 21    (210 ILCS 25/7-120 new)22    Sec. 7-120. Messenger ribonucleic acid (mRNA) vaccine 23testing and labeling; rules. The Department must adopt rules 24to implement the changes made by this amendatory Act of the   HB1105- 4 -LRB104 03801 BAB 13825 b1104th General Assembly.